Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7021
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 54.
January 1, 2035